North Dakota, session 69, HB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Law enforcement family scholarship program - Administration.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Correctional officer" means an individual who has completed a correctional
officer course approved by the department of corrections and rehabilitation and is
employed by a correctional facility as defined in section 12 - 44.1 - 01 .
b. "Eligible student" means an individual:
(1) For whom a law enforcement officer claimed a dependency exemption on
the law enforcement officer's tax return for the previous year; and
(2) Who is enrolled at an institution of higher education under the control of the
state board of higher education.
c. "Emergency services provider" means an individual employed ful l - time as
emergency medical services personnel as defined under section 23 - 27 - 02 .
d. "Firefighter" means an individual employed as a firefighter by a political
subdivision. The term does not include a firefighter employee of the national
guard.
e. "Law enforcement officer" means a correctional officer, emergency services
provider, firefighter, or peace officer, as defined in this section, who has served
ful l - time in that position in the state for at least three years .
Page No. 1 25.0251.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. "Peace officer" means a public servant authorized by law or a government
agency or branch to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations of
violations of the law.
2. The state board of higher education shall:
a. Administer the law enforcement family scholarship program and adopt
procedures necessary to carry out this section.
b. Grant a scholarship to an eligible student who applies for a scholarship.
3. The amount of the scholarship is a sum equal to fifty percent of the student's tuition,
less any other grants and scholarships the student will receive.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - BOARD OF HIGHER EDUCATION - LAW
ENFORCEMENT FAMILY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$5,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the board of higher education, for
the purpose of distributing scholarships to students who are eligible to receive a law
enforcement family scholarship, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.
Page No. 2 25.0251.02000